Utah statutes.
17B-2a-904.   Regional service areas to become service areas -- Change from regional service area to service area not to affect rights, obligations, board makeup, or property of former regional service area.

(1)  Each regional service area, created and operating under the law in effect before April 30, 2007, becomes on that date a service area, governed by and subject to Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local Districts, and this part.

(2)  The change of an entity from a regional service area to a service area under Subsection (1) does not affect:

(a)  the entity's basic structure and operations or its nature as a body corporate and politic and a political subdivision of the state;

(b)  the ability of the entity to provide the service that the entity:

(i)  was authorized to provide before the change; and

(ii)  provided before the change;

(c)  the validity of the actions taken, bonds issued, or contracts or other obligations entered into by the entity before the change;

(d)  the ability of the entity to continue to impose and collect taxes, fees, and other charges for the service it provides;

(e)  the makeup of the board of trustees;

(f)  the entity's ownership of property acquired before the change; or

(g)  any other powers, rights, or obligations that the entity had before the change, except as modified by this part.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

